Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,187
Matching funds; repayment; required; when.

(1) The project must receive an investment of one billion six hundred million dollars before the end of the transformational period. If the project investment fails to reach such threshold, all of the matching funds paid to the applicant under the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act shall be repaid by the applicant to the director, and the applicant shall be entitled to no matching funds for the project.

(2) The project must maintain the required level of investment for the entire continuation period. If the project fails to maintain the required level of investment for the entire continuation period, all of the matching funds paid to the applicant under the act shall be repaid by the applicant to the director, and the applicant shall be entitled to no matching funds for the project.

(3) The repayment required by this section shall not occur if (a) the failure to receive a donation, or achieve or maintain the required level of investment, was caused by an act of God or a national emergency or (b) the state does not fully fund the matching funds as qualified pursuant to section 81-12,185.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 103;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 189.